Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 476 N 1
SFX 476 0 arengo .

SFX 477 N 1
SFX 477 0 argibi .

SFX 478 N 1
SFX 478 0 arguilan .

SFX 479 N 1
SFX 479 0 arhus .

SFX 480 N 1
SFX 480 0 aria .

SFX 481 N 1
SFX 481 0 aría .

SFX 482 N 1
SFX 482 0 ariannes .

SFX 483 N 1
SFX 483 0 ariara .

SFX 484 N 1
SFX 484 0 arías .

SFX 485 N 1
SFX 485 0 aricá .

SFX 486 N 1
SFX 486 0 aricao .

SFX 487 N 1
SFX 487 0 aricopa .

SFX 488 N 1
SFX 488 0 arie .

SFX 489 N 1
SFX 489 0 aries .

SFX 490 N 1
SFX 490 0 arijampolė .

SFX 491 N 1
SFX 491 0 arilao .

SFX 492 N 1
SFX 492 0 arília .

SFX 493 N 1
SFX 493 0 arin .

SFX 494 N 1
SFX 494 0 arina .

SFX 495 N 1
SFX 495 0 arinette .

SFX 496 N 1
SFX 496 0 aringá .

SFX 497 N 1
SFX 497 0 ariño .

SFX 498 N 1
SFX 498 0 arion .

SFX 499 N 1
SFX 499 0 arioupol .

SFX 500 N 1
SFX 500 0 ariposa .

SFX 501 N 1
SFX 501 0 aris .

SFX 502 N 1
SFX 502 0 arita .

SFX 503 N 1
SFX 503 0 ark .

SFX 504 N 1
SFX 504 0 arke .

SFX 505 N 1
SFX 505 0 arkemis .

SFX 506 N 1
SFX 506 0 arnberg .

SFX 507 N 1
SFX 507 0 arnes .

SFX 508 N 1
SFX 508 0 aro .

SFX 509 N 1
SFX 509 0 árom .

SFX 510 N 1
SFX 510 0 arpur .

SFX 511 N 1
SFX 511 0 arr .

SFX 512 N 1
SFX 512 0 arsingdi .

SFX 513 N 1
SFX 513 0 arsk .

SFX 514 N 1
SFX 514 0 ary .

SFX 515 N 1
SFX 515 0 aryn .

SFX 516 N 1
SFX 516 0 as .

SFX 517 N 1
SFX 517 0 asaki .

SFX 518 N 1
SFX 518 0 ăsăud .

SFX 519 N 1
SFX 519 0 ash .

SFX 520 N 1
SFX 520 0 ashville .

SFX 521 N 1
SFX 521 0 asik .

SFX 522 N 1
SFX 522 0 asota .

SFX 523 N 1
SFX 523 0 assarawa .

SFX 524 N 1
SFX 524 0 assau .

SFX 525 N 1
SFX 525 0 assiriya .

SFX 526 N 1
SFX 526 0 asure .

SFX 527 N 1
SFX 527 0 at .

SFX 528 N 1
SFX 528 0 atal .

SFX 529 N 1
SFX 529 0 atapu .

SFX 530 N 1
SFX 530 0 atchitoches .

SFX 531 N 1
SFX 531 0 ate .

SFX 532 N 1
SFX 532 0 aten .

SFX 533 N 1
SFX 533 0 atin .

SFX 534 N 1
SFX 534 0 ation .

SFX 535 N 1
SFX 535 0 atlı .

SFX 536 N 1
SFX 536 0 atoga .

SFX 537 N 1
SFX 537 0 atov .

SFX 538 N 1
SFX 538 0 atsu .

SFX 539 N 1
SFX 539 0 atsuki .

SFX 540 N 1
SFX 540 0 au .

SFX 541 N 1
SFX 541 0 aunton .

SFX 542 N 1
SFX 542 0 aur .

SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 0 ava .

SFX 544 N 1
SFX 544 0 avane .

SFX 545 N 1
SFX 545 0 avanger .

SFX 546 N 1
SFX 546 0 avenworth .

SFX 547 N 1
SFX 547 0 avropol .

SFX 548 N 1
SFX 548 0 avu .

SFX 549 N 1
SFX 549 0 awak .

SFX 550 N 1
SFX 550 0 awan .

SFX 551 N 1
SFX 551 0 awardenapura .

SFX 552 N 1
SFX 552 0 aware .

SFX 553 N 1
SFX 553 0 awassee .

SFX 554 N 1
SFX 554 0 awba .

SFX 555 N 1
SFX 555 0 awesi .

SFX 556 N 1
SFX 556 0 axaca .

SFX 557 N 1
SFX 557 0 axing .

SFX 558 N 1
SFX 558 0 ay .

SFX 559 N 1
SFX 559 0 ayeque .

SFX 560 N 1
SFX 560 0 aygo .

SFX 561 N 1
SFX 561 0 ayi .

SFX 562 N 1
SFX 562 0 aymaniya .

SFX 563 N 1
SFX 563 0 ayuguan .

SFX 564 N 1
SFX 564 0 azi .

SFX 565 N 1
SFX 565 0 azığ .

SFX 566 N 1
SFX 566 0 ba .

SFX 567 N 1
SFX 567 0 baco .

SFX 568 N 1
SFX 568 0 bad .

SFX 569 N 1
SFX 569 0 badan .

SFX 570 N 1
SFX 570 0 badell .

SFX 571 N 1
SFX 571 0 bah .

SFX 572 N 1
SFX 572 0 baiang .

SFX 573 N 1
SFX 573 0 bakaliki .

SFX 574 N 1
SFX 574 0 bakan .

SFX 575 N 1
SFX 575 0 bal .

SFX 576 N 1
SFX 576 0 bali .

SFX 577 N 1
SFX 577 0 balno .

SFX 578 N 1
SFX 578 0 bana .

SFX 579 N 1
SFX 579 0 bānas .

SFX 580 N 1
SFX 580 0 bango .

SFX 581 N 1
SFX 581 0 banon .

SFX 582 N 1
SFX 582 0 bap .

SFX 583 N 1
SFX 583 0 baquite .

SFX 584 N 1
SFX 584 0 bar .

SFX 585 N 1
SFX 585 0 bará .

SFX 586 N 1
SFX 586 0 bartsa .

SFX 587 N 1
SFX 587 0 basan .

SFX 588 N 1
SFX 588 0 basco .

SFX 589 N 1
SFX 589 0 bati .

SFX 590 N 1
SFX 590 0 baúj .

SFX 591 N 1
SFX 591 0 be .

SFX 592 N 1
SFX 592 0 beellaha .

SFX 593 N 1
SFX 593 0 bei .

SFX 594 N 1
SFX 594 0 beid .

SFX 595 N 1
SFX 595 0 beidian .

SFX 596 N 1
SFX 596 0 beraba .

SFX 597 N 1
SFX 597 0 berallgäu .

SFX 598 N 1
SFX 598 0 berg .

SFX 599 N 1
SFX 599 0 berhausen .

SFX 600 N 1
SFX 600 0 berlândia .

SFX 601 N 1
SFX 601 0 berpfalz .

SFX 602 N 1
SFX 602 0 berry .

SFX 603 N 1
SFX 603 0 bers .

SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 0 bert .

SFX 605 N 1
SFX 605 0 bes .

SFX 606 N 1
SFX 606 0 bhanga .

SFX 607 N 1
SFX 607 0 bi .

SFX 608 N 1
SFX 608 0 bieh .

SFX 609 N 1
SFX 609 0 bihiro .

SFX 610 N 1
SFX 610 0 bin .

SFX 611 N 1
SFX 611 0 bine .

SFX 612 N 1
SFX 612 0 bion .

SFX 613 N 1
SFX 613 0 birabad .

SFX 614 N 1
SFX 614 0 bispo .

SFX 615 N 1
SFX 615 0 blanca .

SFX 616 N 1
SFX 616 0 bląg .

SFX 617 N 1
SFX 617 0 bo .

SFX 618 N 1
SFX 618 0 boão .

SFX 619 N 1
SFX 619 0 bodge .

SFX 620 N 1
SFX 620 0 bon .

SFX 621 N 1
SFX 621 0 bonne .

SFX 622 N 1
SFX 622 0 bora .

SFX 623 N 1
SFX 623 0 bori .

SFX 624 N 1
SFX 624 0 born .

SFX 625 N 1
SFX 625 0 bouctou .

SFX 626 N 1
SFX 626 0 bourne .

SFX 627 N 1
SFX 627 0 bratha .

SFX 628 N 1
SFX 628 0 bre .

SFX 629 N 1
SFX 629 0 brecen .

SFX 630 N 1
SFX 630 0 bria .

SFX 631 N 1
SFX 631 0 bridge .

SFX 632 N 1
SFX 632 0 brier .

SFX 633 N 1
SFX 633 0 briz .

SFX 634 N 1
SFX 634 0 buaeran .

SFX 635 N 1
SFX 635 0 bub .

SFX 636 N 1
SFX 636 0 bucoa .

SFX 637 N 1
SFX 637 0 bud .

SFX 638 N 1
SFX 638 0 buk .

SFX 639 N 1
SFX 639 0 bük .

SFX 640 N 1
SFX 640 0 burg .

SFX 641 N 1
SFX 641 0 burn .

SFX 642 N 1
SFX 642 0 burt .

SFX 643 N 1
SFX 643 0 bury .

SFX 644 N 1
SFX 644 0 bwah .

SFX 645 N 1
SFX 645 0 bzevar .

SFX 646 N 1
SFX 646 0 c .

SFX 647 N 1
SFX 647 0 caba .

SFX 648 N 1
SFX 648 0 cago .

SFX 649 N 1
SFX 649 0 cahontas .

SFX 650 N 1
SFX 650 0 caldes .

SFX 651 N 1
SFX 651 0 calm .

SFX 652 N 1
SFX 652 0 cambia .

SFX 653 N 1
SFX 653 0 camp .

SFX 654 N 1
SFX 654 0 cang .

SFX 655 N 1
SFX 655 0 cante .

SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 0 car .

SFX 657 N 1
SFX 657 0 castle .

SFX 658 N 1
SFX 658 0 catativá .

SFX 659 N 1
SFX 659 0 catepéquez .

SFX 660 N 1
SFX 660 0 catur .

SFX 661 N 1
SFX 661 0 cayali .

SFX 662 N 1
SFX 662 0 cca .

SFX 663 N 1
SFX 663 0 ce .

SFX 664 N 1
SFX 664 0 ced .

SFX 665 N 1
SFX 665 0 cedes .

SFX 666 N 1
SFX 666 0 celejo .

SFX 667 N 1
SFX 667 0 cer .

SFX 668 N 1
SFX 668 0 ch .

SFX 669 N 1
SFX 669 0 chū .

SFX 670 N 1
SFX 670 0 cha .

SFX 671 N 1
SFX 671 0 chabun .

SFX 672 N 1
SFX 672 0 chaburi .

SFX 673 N 1
SFX 673 0 chak .

SFX 674 N 1
SFX 674 0 chakhtinsk .

SFX 675 N 1
SFX 675 0 chang .

SFX 676 N 1
SFX 676 0 châtel .

SFX 677 N 1
SFX 677 0 chau .

SFX 678 N 1
SFX 678 0 che .

SFX 679 N 1
SFX 679 0 chehr .

SFX 680 N 1
SFX 680 0 cheid .

SFX 681 N 1
SFX 681 0 chell .

SFX 682 N 1
SFX 682 0 chen .

SFX 683 N 1
SFX 683 0 chener .

SFX 684 N 1
SFX 684 0 cheng .

SFX 685 N 1
SFX 685 0 chester .

SFX 686 N 1
SFX 686 0 chi .

SFX 687 N 1
SFX 687 0 chikawa .

SFX 688 N 1
SFX 688 0 chipe .

SFX 689 N 1
SFX 689 0 chiura .

SFX 690 N 1
SFX 690 0 chiyo .

SFX 691 N 1
SFX 691 0 chkhumi .

SFX 692 N 1
SFX 692 0 chuan .

SFX 693 N 1
SFX 693 0 chung .

SFX 694 N 1
SFX 694 0 chur .

SFX 695 N 1
SFX 695 0 church .

SFX 696 N 1
SFX 696 0 chusetts .

SFX 697 N 1
SFX 697 0 chutes .

SFX 698 N 1
SFX 698 0 chwad .

SFX 699 N 1
SFX 699 0 ck .

SFX 700 N 1
SFX 700 0 ckasaw .

SFX 701 N 1
SFX 701 0 ckelford .

SFX 702 N 1
SFX 702 0 ckermark .

SFX 703 N 1
SFX 703 0 ckland .

SFX 704 N 1
SFX 704 0 ckpur .

SFX 705 N 1
SFX 705 0 clayo .

SFX 706 N 1
SFX 706 0 co .

SFX 707 N 1
SFX 707 0 coas .

SFX 708 N 1
SFX 708 0 cobedo .

SFX 709 N 1
SFX 709 0 coggin .

SFX 710 N 1
SFX 710 0 coln .

SFX 711 N 1
SFX 711 0 concelos .

SFX 712 N 1
SFX 712 0 condido .

SFX 713 N 1
SFX 713 0 coni .

SFX 714 N 1
SFX 714 0 cos .

SFX 715 N 1
SFX 715 0 ços .

SFX 716 N 1
SFX 716 0 cot .

SFX 717 N 1
SFX 717 0 couver .

SFX 718 N 1
SFX 718 0 covis .

SFX 719 N 1
SFX 719 0 cramento .

SFX 720 N 1
SFX 720 0 cuintla .

SFX 721 N 1
SFX 721 0 d .

SFX 722 N 1
SFX 722 0 da .

SFX 723 N 1
SFX 723 0 dabad .

SFX 724 N 1
SFX 724 0 daigne .

SFX 725 N 1
SFX 725 0 daipur .

SFX 726 N 1
SFX 726 0 dale .

SFX 727 N 1
SFX 727 0 dalianchi .

SFX 728 N 1
SFX 728 0 dan .

SFX 729 N 1
SFX 729 0 dar .

SFX 730 N 1
SFX 730 0 darak .

SFX 731 N 1
SFX 731 0 das .

SFX 732 N 1
SFX 732 0 dau .

SFX 733 N 1
SFX 733 0 de .
