Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
Ali/623,655,870,886,908
Allen/726,1712
Ana/584,706,990,1277,1337,1390,1416
Andros/709
Ang/513,542,799
Anse/566
Au/663,703,764,767,942,960,967,968,1530,1542,1565,1581,1661,1663,1668,1672
Bakou/566
Barra/704,1329,1406,1407
Bee/721,1530
Bei/593
Ben/721,862,894,916,933,941,948,963,1016
Black/641,882,1518,1712
Bua/722
Cai/714
Christ/695,1016,1026,1268,1460
Chungcheong/638
Da/607,662,677,733,763,766,787,789,794,873,897,918,929,934
Dar/606,775,885,979,1019,1038,1118,1145,1220,1309,1319,1788
Del/552,891,993,1034,1268,1280,1681
Des/697,976
East/626,839,1192
El/565,587,591,604,616,678,736,760,796,808,859,936,1029,1091,1102,1106,1131,1155,1165,1222,1223,1247,1301,1667,1748
En/653,721,888,923,944,953,966,1100,1348,1513,1616,1621,1632,1701,1714,1734,1768,1816
Es/650,652,682,708,712,720,819,1161,1189,1282,1283,1490,1492,1497,1514,1517,1620,1622,1628,1642,1680,1696,1697,1700,1707,1711,1715,1722,1830
Florida/615
Francis/706
Fu/669,747,817,1115,1120,1121,1124,1125,1126,1128,1129,1138,1144,1175,1176,1179,1181,1200,1219,1229,1249,1315,1317,1341,1421,1525,1526,1577
Gall/533,775,851,1019
Gan/721,741,742,898,946,969,1674,1826,1829
Gao/595,684,1287,1513,1804,1813,1826
Green/632,775,1206,1609,1678,1742,1769,1792
Hama/728,1273
Hat/558,1051,1433,1442,1676
Huai/593,1011,1322
Kara/639,686,899,1111,1131,1136,1259,1275,1599,1691,1718,1775,1777
Kiel/663
Kiri/589
Lai/610,1793,1794,1803,1826
Lara/678,1289
Lin/654,692,710,731,732,744,872,915,932,970,972,977,984,988,1122,1313,1525,1795,1796,1808,1816,1826
Mark/564,978
Massa/646,696,1314
Mer/664,665,667,780,964
Mira/575,1111,1264,1338
Mix/706
Mora/723,1709,1723,1765,1767,1819
Murr/558,1039
Neu/640,676,1266,1312,1397,1528,1656,1665,1763,1787
New/503,560,602,657,1519,1599,1710
Ning/617,733,965
Niš/543
Novo/674,1169,1170,1304,1583,1660,1693,1694,1716
Ordu/568
Oro/718,1288,1822
Phet/671,672
Phú/646
Qar/673
Rai/694,903,909,1253,1409
Rems/680
Resen/733
Rock/631,657,726,882,1063,1192,1776
Rose/540,637,1382,1769
Rui/675,1126,1215,1594
Sei/617,1666
Shi/553,610,722,888,992,1123,1140,1231,1241,1262,1292,1296,1299,1427,1539,1619,1632,1633,1772,1802,1831,1832
Son/510,733,921,939,940,958,972,974,1076,1347,1449,1463,1649,1652
Soroca/566
Sud/643
Ta/583,588,618,622,633,634,638,684,687
Tai/654,693
Terre/621,1227,1599
Tre/526,948,1071,1196,1306,1336,1351,1413,1417,1418,1599,1754
Triesen/598
Tsu/689,805,1174,1596,1801
Tum/605,805,1177,1751
Va/548,707,756,771
Vas/711,1048,1250
Wah/527,1160
Walla/663
Warri/699,1374
West/685,839,850,1278,1290,1302,1450,1451,1506
Wood/643,882,1595,1599,1648,1779
Wu/675,692,722,727,902,977,979,1010,1122,1412,1521,1592,1593,1664,1674,1783,1794,1798,1810,1824,1825,1826
Ya/636,690,751,931,1016,1110,1149,1162,1180,1184,1236,1244,1252,1255,1257,1260,1272,1276,1286,1305,1311,1313,1326,1331,1333,1356,1363,1364,1368,1371,1380,1394,1398,1411,1414,1432,1433,1476,1486,1530,1534,1546,1554,1653,1675,1699,1703,1719,1724,1729,1761,1762,1821,1828
Yong/684,692,988,1120,1138,1826
